New York, session 2025-2026, A5425.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "New York State buy North American act". 3 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 162-b to 4 read as follows: 5 § 162-b. The New York state buy North American act. 1. Use of North 6 American materials. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when 7 soliciting a contract for the purchase of manufactured products used in 8 building projects, including but not limited to plumbing fixtures, 9 flooring, lumber, exterior windows, exterior doors and facades, any 10 department or agency of the state shall award such contract to the 11 responsible and reliable bidder offering to supply manufactured products 12 used in building projects produced or made in whole or substantial part 13 in North America when such offer is within ten percent of the lowest 14 price or best value offer, rather than to the lowest responsible and 15 reliable bidder. 16 (b) If it has been determined by a court or federal or state agency 17 that any person intentionally carried out any of the following, then 18 such person shall be ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract 19 with this state pursuant to the debarment or suspension provisions 20 provided under section one hundred thirty-nine-a of this chapter: 21 (i) affixed a label bearing a "Made in North America" inscription, or 22 any inscription with the same meaning, to any manufactured product used 23 in building projects to which this section applies, sold in or shipped EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04153-05-5 A. 5425--A 2 1 to the United States that was not produced or made in whole or substan- 2 tial part in North America; or 3 (ii) represented that any manufactured product used in building 4 projects procured in a contract to which this section applies that was 5 not produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America, 6 was produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America. 7 (c) This section shall be applied in a manner consistent with the 8 state's obligations under any applicable international agreements 9 pertaining to government procurement. 10 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following words 11 shall have the following meanings unless specified otherwise: 12 (a) "Public agency" means a governmental entity as that term is 13 defined in section one hundred thirty-nine-j of this chapter. 14 (b) "Manufactured products used in building projects produced or made 15 in whole or in part in North America" means the total value, in United 16 States dollars, of the fabrication materials, extrusions, components, 17 hardware, and labor sourced, manufactured, and/or performed in North 18 America equals or exceeds seventy-five percent of the total value of all 19 materials, extrusions, components, hardware, and labor for the finished 20 manufactured products used in building projects. 21 (c) "United States" means the United States of America and includes 22 all territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of 23 the United States. 24 (d) "North America" means the United States, Canada and Mexico. 25 § 3. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new section 26 104-e to read as follows: 27 § 104-e. The New York state buy North American act. 1. Use of North 28 American materials. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when 29 soliciting a contract for the purchase of manufactured products used in 30 building projects, including but not limited to plumbing fixtures, 31 flooring, lumber, exterior windows, exterior doors and facades, any 32 department or agency of a political subdivision shall award such 33 contract to the responsible and reliable bidder offering to supply manu- 34 factured products used in building projects produced or made in whole or 35 substantial part in North America when such offer is within ten percent 36 of the lowest price or best value offer, rather than to the lowest 37 responsible and reliable bidder. 38 (b) If it has been determined by a court or federal or state agency 39 that any person intentionally carried out any of the following, then 40 such person shall be ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract 41 with this state pursuant to the debarment or suspension provisions 42 provided under section one hundred thirty-nine-a of the state finance 43 law: 44 (i) affixed a label bearing a "Made in North America" inscription, or 45 any inscription with the same meaning, to any manufactured product used 46 in building projects to which this section applies, sold in or shipped 47 to the United States that was not produced or made in whole or substan- 48 tial part in North America; or 49 (ii) represented that any manufactured product used in building 50 projects procured in a contract to which this section applies that was 51 not produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America, 52 was produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America. 53 (c) This section shall be applied in a manner consistent with the 54 state's obligations under any applicable international agreements 55 pertaining to government procurement. A. 5425--A 3 1 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following words 2 shall have the following meanings unless specified otherwise: 3 (a) "Public agency" means a governmental entity as that term is 4 defined in section one hundred thirty-nine-j of the state finance law. 5 (b) "Manufactured products used in building projects produced or made 6 in whole or in part in North America" means the total value, in United 7 States dollars, of the fabrication materials, extrusions, components, 8 hardware, and labor sourced, manufactured, and/or performed in North 9 America equals or exceeds seventy-five percent of the total value of all 10 materials, extrusions, components, hardware, and labor for the finished 11 manufactured product used in building projects. 12 (c) "United States" means the United States of America and includes 13 all territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of 14 the United States. 15 (d) "North America" means the United States, Canada and Mexico. 16 § 4. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section 17 2877-b to read as follows: 18 § 2877-b. The New York state buy North American act. 1. Use of North 19 American materials. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when 20 soliciting a contract for the purchase of manufactured products used in 21 building projects, including but not limited to plumbing fixtures, 22 flooring, lumber, exterior windows, exterior doors and facades, any 23 public authority shall award such contract to the responsible and reli- 24 able bidder offering to supply manufactured products used in building 25 projects produced or made in whole or substantial part in North America 26 when such offer is within ten percent of the lowest price or best value 27 offer, rather than to the lowest responsible and reliable bidder. 28 (b) If it has been determined by a court or federal or state agency 29 that any person intentionally carried out any of the following, then 30 such person shall be ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract 31 with this state pursuant to the debarment or suspension provisions 32 provided under section one hundred thirty-nine-a of the state finance 33 law: 34 (i) affixed a label bearing a "Made in North America" inscription, or 35 any inscription with the same meaning, to any manufactured product used 36 in building projects to which this section applies, sold in or shipped 37 to the United States that was not produced or made in whole or substan- 38 tial part in North America; or 39 (ii) represented that any manufactured product used in building 40 projects procured in a contract to which this section applies that was 41 not produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America, 42 was produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America. 43 (c) This section shall be applied in a manner consistent with the 44 state's obligations under any applicable international agreements 45 pertaining to government procurement. 46 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following words 47 shall have the following meanings unless specified otherwise: 48 (a) "Public authority" means a state, local or interstate authority as 49 such terms are defined in section two of this chapter. 50 (b) "Manufactured products used in building projects produced or made 51 in whole or in part in North America" means the total value, in United 52 States dollars, of the fabrication materials, extrusions, components, 53 hardware, and labor sourced, manufactured, and/or performed in North 54 America equals or exceeds seventy-five percent of the total value of all 55 materials, extrusions, components, hardware, and labor for the finished 56 manufactured product used in building projects. A. 5425--A 4 1 (c) "United States" means the United States of America and includes 2 all territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of 3 the United States. 4 (d) "North America" means the United States, Canada and Mexico. 5 § 5. Article 50 and sections 1000, 1001, 1002, and 1003 of the execu- 6 tive law, as renumbered by chapter 770 of the laws of 1978, are renum- 7 bered to be article 60 and sections 1100, 1101, 1102, and 1103 and a new 8 article 50 is added to read as follows: 9 ARTICLE 50 10 NEW YORK STATE BUY NORTH AMERICAN ACT 11 Section 1010. Statement of purpose. 12 1011. Definitions. 13 1012. Use of North American made manufactured products used in 14 building projects for a covered affordable housing 15 project. 16 § 1010. Statement of purpose. It is the purpose of this article to 17 encourage and promote the purchase of North American made manufactured 18 products used in building projects for covered affordable housing 19 projects paid for in whole or in part out of public funds. 20 § 1011. Definitions. For purposes of this article, the following terms 21 shall have the following meanings: 22 1. "Covered affordable housing project" shall mean construction work 23 done under contract for an affordable housing project which is paid for 24 in whole or in part out of public funds, as such term is defined in this 25 section, where the amount of all such public funds, when aggregated, is 26 at least thirty percent of the total construction project costs and 27 where such project costs are over five million dollars. 28 2. "Paid for in whole or in part out of public funds" shall mean any 29 of the following: 30 (a) the payment of money, by a public entity, or a third party acting 31 on behalf of and for the benefit of a public entity, directly to or on 32 behalf of a contractor, subcontractor, developer or owner that is not 33 subject to repayment; 34 (b) the savings achieved from fees, rents, interest rates, or other 35 loan costs, or insurance costs that are lower than market rate costs; 36 savings from reduced taxes as a result of tax credits, tax abatements, 37 tax exemptions or tax increment financing; savings from payments in lieu 38 of taxes; and any other savings from reduced, waived, or forgiven costs 39 that would have otherwise been at a higher or market rate but for the 40 involvement of a public entity; 41 (c) money loaned by a public entity that is to be repaid on a contin- 42 gent basis; or 43 (d) credits that are applied by a public entity against repayment of 44 obligations to such public entity. 45 3. "Manufactured products used in building projects produced or made 46 in whole or in part in North America" means the total value, in United 47 States dollars, of the fabrication materials, extrusions, components, 48 hardware, and labor sourced, manufactured, and/or performed in North 49 America equals or exceeds seventy-five percent of the total value of all 50 materials, extrusions, components, hardware, and labor for the finished 51 manufactured product used in building projects. 52 4. "United States" means the United States of America and includes all 53 territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of the 54 United States. 55 5. "North America" means the United States, Canada and Mexico. A. 5425--A 5 1 § 1012. Use of North American made manufactured products used in 2 building projects for a covered affordable housing project. 1. Notwith- 3 standing any other provision of law, any owner, developer, contractor or 4 subcontractor when soliciting a contract for the purchase of manufac- 5 tured products used in building projects, including but not limited to 6 plumbing fixtures, flooring, lumber, exterior windows, exterior doors 7 and facades, for a covered affordable housing project as defined in 8 section one thousand eleven of this article, shall award such contract 9 to the responsible and reliable bidder offering to supply manufactured 10 products used in building projects produced or made in whole or substan- 11 tial part in North America when such offer is within ten percent of the 12 lowest price or best value offer, rather than to the lowest and reliable 13 bidder. 14 2. If it has been determined by a court or federal or state agency 15 that any person intentionally carried out any of the following, then 16 such person shall be ineligible to receive any contract or subcontract 17 with this state pursuant to the debarment or suspension provisions 18 provided under section one hundred thirty-nine-a of the state finance 19 law: 20 (a) affixed a label bearing a "Made in North America" inscription, or 21 any inscription with the same meaning, to any manufactured product used 22 in building projects to which this section applies, sold in or shipped 23 to the United States that was not produced or made in whole or substan- 24 tial part in North America; or 25 (b) represented that any manufactured product used in building 26 projects procured in a contract to which this section applies that was 27 not produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America, 28 was produced or made in whole or in substantial part in North America. 29 3. This section shall be applied in a manner consistent with the 30 state's obligations under any applicable international agreements 31 pertaining to government procurement. 32 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 33 it shall have become a law.